Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 9. Emergency Administration Of Medical Treatment Act

§ 35-4-901.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Emergency Administration of Medical Treatment Act.”

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Medical Treatment” for “Opiate Antagonist.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-4-902.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Opiate antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride, narcan or any other brand name used for naloxone hydrochloride approved by the United States food and drug administration for the treatment of an opiate related drug overdose;

“Opiate related drug overdose” means a condition, including extreme physical illness, a decreased level of consciousness or respiratory depression resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid, or another substance with which an opioid was combined, that a reasonable person would believe to require medical assistance;

“Pharmacist” means any person licensed under Wyoming statutes as a pharmacist and who is practicing within the scope of their license;

“Practitioner” means any person licensed under Wyoming statutes as a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse and who is practicing within the scope of their license;

“Standing order” means an order transmitted electronically or in writing by a practitioner for a drug or device for a patient or multiple patients with whom no prescriber-patient relationship exists;

“Entity” means any person as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(vi), and includes the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges, who employs persons who, in the course of their official duties or business, may encounter a person experiencing anaphylaxis or an opioid related drug overdose;

“Opioid” or “opiate” means an opiumlike compound that binds to one (1) or more of the major opioid receptors in the body;

“Epinephrine auto-injector” means an automatic injectable device that administers the drug epinephrine to a person experiencing anaphylaxis and includes epipens or any other device under a different brand name used for emergency epinephrine delivery for the treatment of anaphylaxis and which device is approved by the United States food and drug administration.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 103, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(vi), added “, and includes the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges,” and “anaphylaxis or”; added “or ‘opiate’” in (a)(vii); and added (a)(viii).

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-4-903.
Prescription of epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist.

A practitioner or a pharmacist acting in good faith and exercising reasonable care may, without a prescriber-patient relationship, prescribe an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist to:

A person at risk of experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose;

A person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose;

A person who, in the course of the person’s official duties or business, may encounter a person experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose.

A practitioner or pharmacist who prescribes an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist under this article shall provide education to the person to whom the epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist is prescribed, which shall include written instruction on how to:

Recognize anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose;

Respond appropriately to an anaphylaxis or opiate related drug overdose event, including how to administer epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or administer an opiate antagonist;

Ensure that a person to whom epinephrine or an opiate antagonist has been administered receives, as soon as possible, additional medical care and a medical evaluation.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “anaphylaxis or” preceding “an opiate related” throughout the section; added “epinephrine auto-injector or an” in the introductory language of (a); in the introductory language of (b), added “epinephrine auto-injector or an” following “prescribes an,” added “epinephrine auto-injector or” following “whom the”; in (b)(ii), added “anaphylaxis or” and “epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or administer”; and added “epinephrine or” in (b)(iii).

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-4-904.
Standing order for epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist; anaphylaxis and drug overdose treatment policy; rules.

A practitioner acting in good faith and exercising reasonable care may prescribe by a standing order an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist to an entity that, in the course of the entity’s official duties or business, may be in a position to assist a person experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose.

An entity prescribed an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist by standing order shall establish an anaphylaxis or a drug overdose treatment policy in accordance with rules adopted by the department of health. The anaphylaxis or drug overdose treatment policy shall:

Provide for the designation of individuals to receive training and instructional materials on how to recognize and respond to anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose and ensure that a person to whom epinephrine or an opiate antagonist has been administered receives additional medical care and a medical evaluation;

Provide for reporting to the department of health, in the manner and form prescribed by the department, all anaphylaxis events or opiate related drug overdoses for which epinephrine or an opiate antagonist is administered under this article.

The Wyoming state board of medicine and the Wyoming state board of nursing may adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer prescription of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist by a standing order.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “epinephrine auto-injector or an” preceding “opiate antagonist” throughout the section; added “anaphylaxis or” in (a); in the introductory language of (b), added “an anaphylaxis or” in the first sentence and “anaphylaxis or” in the second sentence; in (b)(i), added “anaphylaxis or” and “epinephrine or”; and in (b)(ii), added “anaphylaxis events or,” “epinephrine or,” and “under this article.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-4-905.
Voluntary participation.

This article does not establish a duty or standard of care for a person to prescribe or administer epinephrine, through use of an epinephrine auto-injector, or an opiate antagonist.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “epinephrine, through use of an epinephrine auto-injector, or.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-4-906.
Administration of an epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist; immunity from liability; exemption from unprofessional conduct; relation to other law.

A person acting in good faith may administer epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist to another person who appears to be experiencing anaphylaxis or an opiate related drug overdose.

A person who administers epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist pursuant to this article is personally immune from civil or criminal liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury.

A practitioner or pharmacist who prescribes an epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist pursuant to this article is personally immune from civil or criminal liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury.

An entity that establishes an anaphylaxis or drug overdose treatment policy pursuant to this article is immune from civil or criminal liability for any act or omission related to the administration of epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or an opiate antagonist resulting in damage or injury.

Prescribing an epinephrine auto-injector or opiate antagonist by a practitioner or pharmacist pursuant to this article shall not constitute unprofessional conduct.

Should any grant of immunity, exception or imposition of liability within the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act conflict with any provision of this article, this article shall prevail.

History.

2017 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “epinephrine through use of an epinephrine auto-injector or” preceding “an opiate antagonist” in (a), (b), and (d); added “anaphylaxis or” in (a); added “epinephrine auto-injector or” in (c); substituted “an anaphylaxis or” for “a” in (d); and added “epinephrine auto-injector or” in (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.